Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 3

Campaign Contributions Limits

2-10-301. Short title — Jurisdiction.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Campaign Contribution Limits Act of 1995.”

The registry of election finance has jurisdiction to administer and enforce this part.

Acts 1995, ch. 531, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 531, § 17 provided that the amendment by that act shall only apply to contributions and expenditures made after January 1, 1996.

Law Reviews.

Mistaken Identity: Unveiling the Property Characteristics of Political Money, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 1235 (2000).

The Court in Action: A summary of key cases from the U.S. Supreme Court 2000-2001 (Perry A. Craft and Arshad (Paku) Khan), 37 No. 9 Tenn. B.J. 18 (2001).

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of campaign finance reform, OAG 95-058 (5/24/95).

Constitutionality under separation of powers clause, OAG 96-021 (2/16/96).

Candidate's acceptance of contributions for primary election that may not occur, OAG 97-137 (10/06/97).

The provisions regarding campaign contributions do not apply to federal elections in Tennessee, OAG 00-099 (5/24/00).

Neither the Campaign Financial Disclosure Act or the Campaign Contribution Limits Act contains any time limitation on when a multicandidate political campaign committee must support or oppose a second candidate or measure, OAG 03-112 (9/9/03).

Collateral References.

Constitutional Validity of State or Local Regulation of Contributions by or to Political Action Committees. 24 A.L.R.6th 179.

2-10-302. Contribution limits.

No person shall make contributions to any candidate with respect to any election which, in the aggregate, exceed:

For an office elected by statewide election, two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500); or

For any other state or local public office, one thousand dollars ($1,000).

No multicandidate political campaign committee shall make contributions to any candidate with respect to any election which, in the aggregate, exceed:

For an office elected by statewide election or the senate, seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500); and

For any other state or local public office, five thousand dollars ($5,000).

With respect to contributions from multicandidate political campaign committees for each election:

No candidate for an office elected by statewide election shall accept in the aggregate more than fifty percent (50%) of the candidate's total contributions from multicandidate political campaign committees; and

No candidate for any other state or local public office shall accept in the aggregate more than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) from multicandidate political campaign committees.

In determining the aggregate limits established by this subsection (c), contributions made to a candidate by a committee controlled by a political party on the national, state, or local level or by a caucus of such political party established by members of either house of the general assembly are not included.

Each contribution limit established in subsection (a), (b) or (c) shall be adjusted to reflect the percentage of change in the average consumer price index (all items-city average), as published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the period of January 1, 1996, through December 31, 2010. Each such adjustment shall be rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars ($100). The registry of election finance shall publish each such adjusted amount on its web site.

On January 1, 2013, and every two (2) years thereafter, each contribution limit established in subsection (a), (b) or (c), as adjusted pursuant to subdivision (d)(1), shall be further adjusted to reflect the percentage of change in the average consumer price index (all items-city average), as published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the two-year period immediately preceding. Each such adjustment under this subdivision (d)(2) shall be rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars ($100). The registry of election finance shall publish each such adjusted amount on its web site.

Acts 1995, ch. 531, § 1; 2003, ch. 416, § 1; 2011, ch. 389, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 531, § 16 provides that if any provision of (c)(1) [the former provisions of (c)(1) were deleted by 2003 amendment] or (d)(1) [now (c)(1)(A)] or their application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, then the provisions and applications of (c)(1) and (d)(1) are declared to be invalid and void.

The website for the Tennessee Registry of Election Finance referenced in this section may be found at http://www.state.tn.us/tref.

Attorney General Opinions. Anonymous campaign contributions, OAG 97-065 (5/12/97).

State limits on candidate's personal campaign contributions unconstitutional, OAG 98-016 (1/15/98).

Subsection (c)'s contribution limits unconstitutional, OAG 98-016 (1/15/98).

Attribution and disclosure of post-election contribution to successful debt-free candidate, OAG 98-0122 (7/10/98).

Application of campaign finance legislation to limited liability companies, OAG 99-086 (4/8/99).

The Tennessee registry of election finance cannot constitutionally enforce the contribution limits of T.C.A. §2-10-302(c) (deleted by 2003 amendment) on a candidate's loan to the candidate's campaign committee, OAG 01-161 (11/5/01).

Legality of campaign contributions by limited partnership, OAG 04-050 (3/23/04).

A contribution from a limited liability company or a partnership may be attributed to an individual member or partner for purposes of the contribution limits if particular facts and circumstances show the member directed the contribution through the company as a conduit or intermediary, OAG 05-003 (1/05/05).

Application of campaign finance laws to limited liability companies. OAG 11-83, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 85 (12/29/11).

2-10-303. Indirect contributions — Political action committees.

For purposes of the limitations contained in this part:

Contributions made to any political campaign committee authorized by a candidate to accept contributions on the candidate's behalf shall be considered to be contributions made to such candidate;

Contributions made by a political campaign committee authorized by a candidate to make expenditures on the candidate's behalf shall be considered contributions made by such candidate;

All contributions made by a person, either directly or indirectly, on behalf of a particular candidate, including contributions which are in any way earmarked or otherwise directed through an intermediary or conduit to such candidate, shall be treated as contributions from such person to such candidate. The intermediary or conduit shall report the original source and the intended recipient of such contribution to the registry of election finance and to the intended recipient;

All contributions made by affiliated political campaign committees shall be considered to have been made by a single committee; and

Expenditures made by any person in cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, the candidate's political campaign committees, or their agents, shall be considered to be a contribution to such candidate. For purposes of this subdivision (5), the financing by any person of the dissemination, distribution, or republication, in whole or in part, of any broadcast or any written, graphic, or other form of campaign materials prepared by the candidate, the candidate's political campaign committees, or their authorized agents shall be considered to be an expenditure.

Acts 1995, ch. 531, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Independent election expenditures, OAG 96-90 (7/24/96).

Application of campaign finance legislation to limited liability companies, OAG 99-086 (4/8/99).

Whether a particular organization or person is a “conduit” or “intermediary” for purposes of subsection (3) of this section will depend upon individual facts and circumstances; the Registry of Finance is empowered to apply the statute to particular facts and circumstances to determine if the Contribution Limits Act has been violated, OAG 03-112 (9/9/03).

A contribution from a limited liability company or a partnership may be attributed to an individual member or partner for purposes of the contribution limits if particular facts and circumstances show the member directed the contribution through the company as a conduit or intermediary, OAG 05-003 (1/05/05).

2-10-304. Loans.

The limitations contained in this part do not apply to any loan of money by a financial institution as defined in § 45-10-102 that:

Is made in accordance with applicable law and in the ordinary course of business;

Is made on a basis reasonably designed to assure repayment, evidenced by a written instrument, and subject to a payment due date or amortization schedule; and

Bears the usual and customary interest rate of the lending institution.

An endorsement or guaranty of a loan made pursuant to subsection (a) shall be considered a contribution in the amount of the endorsement or guaranty and shall be subject to the limitations contained in this part. Where the written instrument does not specify the portion of the loan for which the endorser or guarantor is liable, each endorser or guarantor shall be considered to have made a contribution in that proportion of the unpaid balance that each endorser or guarantor bears to the total number of endorsers or guarantors.

Acts 1995, ch. 531, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Legislator's use of personal or borrowed funds in campaign during legislative session, OAG 98-062 (3/9/98).

2-10-305. Retention or transfer of funds.

The limits contained in this part do not apply to:

The retention of funds by a candidate pursuant to § 2-10-114(a)(1);

The transfer of funds by a candidate pursuant to § 2-10-114(a)(1) to a campaign fund of the same candidate for election to a different state or local public office; or

The transfer of funds by a candidate for election to a federal office to a campaign fund of the same candidate for election to a state or local public office.

Acts 1995, ch. 531, § 1.

2-10-306. Aggregate limits — Exemptions.

All contributions made by political campaign committees controlled by a political party on the national, state, or local level or by a caucus of such political party established by members of either house of the general assembly shall be considered to have been made by a single committee. Such contributions shall not, in the aggregate, exceed:

Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per election to any candidate in a statewide election;

Forty thousand dollars ($40,000) per election to any candidate for the senate; and

Twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per election to any candidate for any other state or local public office.

For purposes of this section, “contributions” does not include:

Payment of the costs of preparation, display or mailing or other distribution with respect to printed slate cards, sample ballots, or other printed listings of three (3) or more candidates who are opposed for election. This exemption does not apply to costs incurred with respect to the preparation and display of listings made on broadcasting stations or in newspapers, magazines and similar types of general public political advertising such as billboards;

Payment of the costs of voter registration and get-out-the-vote activities conducted by party committees, unless the payments are made on behalf of a clearly identified candidate and the payment can be directly attributed to that candidate;

Expenditures for rent, personnel, overhead, general administrative, fundraising, and other day-to-day costs of party committees, unless the expenditures are made on behalf of a clearly identified candidate and the expenditure can be directly attributed to that candidate; or

Expenditures for education campaign seminars and for training of campaign workers, unless the expenditures are made on behalf of a clearly identified candidate and the expenditure can be directly attributed to that candidate.

Each contribution limit established in subsection (a) shall be adjusted to reflect the percentage of change in the average consumer price index (all items-city average), as published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the period of January 1, 1996, through December 31, 2010. Each such adjustment shall be rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars ($100). The registry of election finance shall publish each such adjusted amount on its web site.

On January 1, 2013, and every two (2) years thereafter, each contribution limit established in subsection (a), as adjusted pursuant to subdivision (c)(1), shall be further adjusted to reflect the percentage of change in the average consumer price index (all items-city average), as published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the two-year period immediately preceding. Each such adjustment under this subdivision (c)(2) shall be rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars ($100). The registry of election finance shall publish each such adjusted amount on its web site.

Acts 1995, ch. 531, § 1; 2011, ch. 389, § 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Independent election expenditures, OAG 96-90 (7/24/96).

2-10-307. Violations — Return of unlawful contributions.

No candidate or political campaign committee shall accept any contribution or make any expenditure in violation of this part. No officer or employee of a political campaign committee shall accept a contribution made for the benefit or use of a candidate, or make any expenditure on behalf of a candidate, in violation of any limitation imposed on contributions and expenditures under this section.

In keeping with the federal law, a contribution made or accepted in excess of the limitations established by this part shall not be a violation of this part if the candidate or the political campaign committee returns or refunds the contribution to the person who made the contribution within sixty (60) days of the candidate's or committee's receipt of the contribution.

Acts 1995, ch. 531, § 1.

2-10-308. Penalties.

The registry of election finance may impose a maximum civil penalty for a violation of this part of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the amount of all contributions made or accepted in excess of the limitations established by this part, whichever is greater.

Penalties imposed under this part shall be deposited into the state general fund.

To request a waiver or reduction or in any way to contest a penalty imposed by the staff of the registry, a person shall file a petition with the registry. Such petition shall be considered as a contested case proceeding under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

If a civil penalty lawfully assessed against a candidate is not paid within thirty (30) days after the assessment becomes final, the candidate shall be ineligible to qualify for election to any state or local public office until such penalty is paid.

Acts 1995, ch. 531, § 1.

2-10-309. Construction with federal law.

In determining issues arising in regard to this part, the registry may rely on the precedents established under the federal law.

Acts 1995, ch. 531, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Mistaken Identity: Unveiling the Property Characteristics of Political Money, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 1235 (2000).

2-10-310. Fund raising during general assembly session.

Except as provided in subdivisions (a)(2) and (a)(3), from the convening of the general assembly in organizational session through the earlier of the last day of regular session or June 1 in odd years, and from the convening of the general assembly in regular session to the earlier of May 15 or the conclusion of the annual session in even years, and from the convening of the general assembly in any extraordinary session through the conclusion of such extraordinary session, no member of the general assembly or a member's campaign committee or the governor or the governor's campaign committee shall conduct a fundraiser or solicit or accept contributions for the benefit of the caucus, any caucus member or member or candidate of the general assembly or governor.

During such period, a member of the general assembly who is a candidate for a local public office shall be permitted to conduct fundraising events and solicit or accept contributions for such campaign for local public office only under the following conditions:

Such fundraising events may be held only in the county in which such member is a candidate for local public office;

Solicitations and acceptance of contributions for such purposes may only be made from individuals residing in such county;

Such fundraising events shall not be held, nor contributions be solicited nor accepted, on state property;

The member shall not be permitted to solicit or accept, directly or indirectly, any actual or in-kind contribution during such period from a lobbyist or employer of a lobbyist; and

No other member of the general assembly or the campaign committee of such other member shall be permitted to solicit or accept contributions during such period for the member campaigning for local public office.

It shall be unlawful for any lobbyist or employer of a lobbyist to make any contribution to such member's campaign committee during such period for any purpose.

All contributions raised as a result of fundraising or a fundraising event authorized and held in accordance with subdivision (a)(2) shall be reported on a form prescribed and provided by the registry of election finance for such purposes. Such form shall be filed with and attached to the applicable campaign finance disclosure report. The following disclosures shall be made on such form:

The amount of contributions collected as a result of such fundraising event;

The date and place such fundraising event was held;

The dates on which such contributions were accepted; and

All other information required by law to be reported on a campaign financial disclosure report.

From the convening of the general assembly in organizational session through the earlier of the last day of regular session or June 1 in odd years, and from the convening of the general assembly in regular session to the earlier of May 15 or the conclusion of the annual session in even years, and from the convening of the general assembly in any extraordinary session through the conclusion of such extraordinary session, a political campaign committee controlled by a political party on the national, state, or local level, or controlled by a caucus of such political party established by members of either house of the general assembly, or established or controlled by any member of the general assembly, that makes contributions to a candidate for the general assembly or governor for election or to defray the expenses of such person's office shall not conduct a fundraiser, solicit or accept contributions for the benefit of the caucus, any caucus member or candidate for the general assembly or governor.

Excess funds for election to a local public office are not eligible for transfer under § 2-10-114 to a campaign account for election to the general assembly or governor.

Acts 1995, ch. 531, § 1; 1998, ch. 1062, § 7; 2002, ch. 470, § 1; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, §§ 17, 18; 2011, ch. 389, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Attorney General Opinions. Fund raising for campaign for local office, OAG 97-147 (10/23/97).

Fund raising for campaign for judicial office, OAG 97-148 (10/23/97).

Application to recall petition for city council member, OAG 97-149 (10/23/97).

Nonlegislators not barred from fund raising, OAG 97-158 (12/01/97).

Contribution of candidate's personal funds during legislative session, OAG 98-061 (3/9/98), OAG 98-062 (3/9/98).

Legislative history and construction of subsection (a), OAG 98-061 (3/9/98), OAG 98-062 (3/9/98).

Legislator's use of personal or borrowed funds in campaign during legislative session, OAG 98-062 (3/9/98).

Campaign fundraising by legislator for county office, OAG 00-011 (1/24/00).

A state legislator can legally raise money for a federal race while the state legislature is in session; the prohibition on legislative fundraising does not apply to campaigns for federal office, OAG 00-185 (12/13/00).

The statute does not prohibit a multicandidate political campaign committee, which is not associated with a political party but whose treasurer is a state legislator, from soliciting or accepting contributions during the legislative session, so long as the committee is not a conduit for contributions to a member or candidate of the general assembly or governor, OAG 02-005 (1/3/02).

Notwithstanding the 2002 amendment to T.C.A. §2-10-310(a)(2), the statute still prohibits a member of the legislature from soliciting and accepting contributions from multicandidate political campaign committees for a local election during the periods specified in the statute, OAG 02-049 (4/17/02).

In even-numbered years before May 15 or the end of the regular annual session, whichever is earlier, a member of the general assembly may not solicit or accept campaign contributions for the member's legislative campaign for state office; a legislator may solicit or accept campaign contributions for the campaign for local office only under the narrow circumstances outlined in T.C.A. §2-10-310(a)(2), OAG 02-062 (5/16/02).

A legislator may not accept the payment of a pledge from the convening of the general assembly through the earlier of the last day of regular session or June 1 in odd years, and from the convening of the General Assembly to the earlier of May 15 or the conclusion of the annual session in even years, OAG 04-030 (2/25/04).

Constitutionality of ban on in-session contributions, OAG 07-017 (2/13/07).

Constitutionality of ban on in-session contributions, OAG 07-020 (2/26/07).

Member of the general assembly may raise funds for a campaign for election to a federal office while the general assembly is in session, OAG 09-017 (2/25/09).

Constitutionality of restriction on fund-raising activities of incumbent legislators; legislative power to fill vacancy in judicial office by appointment. OAG 10-11, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (1/28/10).

2-10-311. Limitations on cash contributions.

No person shall make cash contributions to any candidate with respect to any election that, in the aggregate, exceed fifty dollars ($50.00).

No person shall make cash contributions to any political campaign committee or multicandidate political campaign committee with respect to any election that, in the aggregate, exceed fifty dollars ($50.00).

No political campaign committee or multicandidate political campaign committee shall make cash contributions to any candidate with respect to any election.

No political campaign committee or multicandidate political campaign committee shall make cash contributions to any other political campaign committee or multicandidate political campaign committee with respect to any election.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that act is, and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

2-10-312. [Repealed.]

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 51, repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 389, § 6, effective June 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former §2-10-312 concerned aggregate contribution limits and adjustments.